Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 6-1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-1. A. The State Veterinarian shall be the holder of:
1. Hold a current license to practice veterinary medicine in
Oklahoma,;
2. Have experience in food animal veterinary practice; and
shall be
3. Be appointed by the State Board of Agriculture.
B. The Board shall fix the compensation and duties of the State
Veterinarian.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3977 Page 2